Utah statutes.
54-7-27.   Violations by corporations other than utilities -- Penalty.

Every corporation, other than a public utility, which violates any provision of this title, or which fails to obey, observe or comply with any order, decision, rule, direction, demand or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, of the commission, in a case in which a penalty has not hereinbefore been provided for such corporation, is subject to a penalty of not less than $500 nor more than $2,000 for each and every offense.

